Nebraska, session 109, LB1162.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1162 LB1162
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 75-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-401 (1) The commission shall exercise jurisdiction over the
service, facilities, and equipment of all railroad carriers in this
state. This jurisdiction shall extend and apply to the general public, as
well as those having business relations with the railroad carrier.
Sections 75-401 to 75-430 shall not be construed as giving the commission
jurisdiction or control over the relations between any railroad carrier
and its employees, or its employees' order, union, or other bargaining
agent, either contractual or otherwise, except as provided in sections
75-419 to 75-426.
(2) The commission may adopt the federal railroad safety standards
provided in 49 U.S.C. chapters 201 to 213 and 49 C.F.R. parts 200 to 299,
as such federal laws existed on January 1, 2026, for the limited purpose
of conducting safety inspections and participating in federal railroad
safety programs. The commission may conduct inspections, surveillance,
and related activities that are authorized under the Federal Railroad
Administration's State Safety Participation Program and may report
potential violations of federal railroad safety regulations to the
Federal Railroad Administration for appropriate federal enforcement.
shall enforce the standards of railroad safety set forth in 49 C.F.R.
parts 213, 215, 223, 229, 231, and 232.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-